Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.700

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 19.27.710 through 19.27.740.

(1) "Combination fire and smoke damper" has the same meaning as provided in the International Fire Code as of January 1, 2020.

(2) "Fire damper" means a device installed in ducts and air transfer openings designed to close automatically upon detection of heat and resist the passage of flame.

(3) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.41.020.

(4) "Local authority" means a fire department or code official with the authority to conduct inspections and issue infractions in a jurisdiction.

(5) "Smoke control system" means an engineered system that includes all methods that can be used singly or in combination to modify smoke movement, including engineered systems that use mechanical fans to produce pressure differences across smoke barriers to inhibit smoke movement.

(6) "Smoke damper" means a device installed in ducts and air transfer openings designed to resist the passage of smoke.

[ 2020 c 88 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 88: "This act takes effect July 1, 2021." [ 2020 c 88 s 8.]